Hawaii statutes.
[§621-28] Accompaniment of children at
judicial proceedings. A child less than fourteen years of age, involved in
a judicial proceeding, including a grand jury proceeding, shall have the right
to be accompanied by a parent, a victim- witness counselor, or other adult
designated by the court. The accompanying person may be placed side by side
with the child at the discretion of the presiding judge or court officer;
provided that this position does not interfere with the proceedings of the
court. The accompanying person shall not communicate in any manner with the
child unless directed by the presiding judge or court officer. [L 1985, c 185,
§1]

Law Journals and Reviews

Rape and Child Sexual Assault: Dispelling the Myths. 14 UH
L. Rev. 157 (1992).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next